Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 25.24.900.
Residency of military personnel.

A person serving in a military branch of the United States government who has been continuously stationed at a military base or installation in the state for at least 30 days is considered a resident of the state for the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 12.09 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 130 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 09.55.160. Renumbered as AS

25.24.100

in 1983. Renumbered again in 1991.

Sec. 25.24.910.
Payment of support to 18-year-olds.

When a court order or judgment provides for child support to be paid for the care of an unmarried 18-year-old child who is actively pursuing a high school diploma or an equivalent level of technical or vocational training while living as a dependent with a parent, guardian, or designee of the parent or guardian, the order or judgment may provide for the support to be paid directly to the child upon terms and conditions considered appropriate by the court.

History.

(§ 9 ch 117 SLA 1992)

Sec. 25.24.920.
Provision of information to child support services agency.

For purposes of 42 U.S.C. 666 and AS

25.27.193

, when a court order or judgment provides for child support to be paid, the clerk of the court shall provide a copy of the order or judgment to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

.

History.

(§ 47 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 25.24.990.
Definition.

In this chapter, “animal” means a vertebrate living creature not a human being.

History.

(§ 26 ch 60 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 26, ch. 60, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on January 1, 2017.